test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v43_odd_kerita_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generätor-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/änälyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generätor-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/änälyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofreäd the gold ständärd (below)
# Then: run änälyser, then correct. 


  Verb - keritä - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     keritä+Hom1+V+Inf: keritä
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kerkkiin
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kerkkiit
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kerkkii
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kerkkiimä
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kerkkiittä
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kerithään
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kerkisin
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kerkisit
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [kerkis, kerkisi]
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kerkisimmä
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kerkisittä
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kerithiin
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: keriny
     keritä+Hom1+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: keritty
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kerinheet
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kerkkiivä
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kerkkiivät
     keritä+Hom1+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kerittävä
     keritä+Hom1+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kerittävät

     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: kerkkiisin
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: kerkkiisit
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: kerkkiis
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: kerkkiisimmä
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: kerkkiisittä
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: kerittäis
     keritä+Hom1+V+Pass+Cond: kerittäis
    
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: kerkkii
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: kerikkää
     
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: kerkkiimässä
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: kerkkiimästä
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: kerkkiimhään
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: kerkkiimällä
     keritä+Hom1+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: kerkkiimättä
